es: Válvula de soplete para gaita escocesa de gran tamaño: Válvula de cartucho; Sin válvula; Válvula de aleta tradicional; Válvula de trampa de agua; Otro
sk-SK: Typ ventila dúchadla škótskych gájd: Kanistrový ventil; Bez ventilu; Tradičný klapkový ventil; Odlučovač vody; Iné
ja: グレートハイランドバグパイプの吹き込み管バルブタイプ: キャニスターバルブ; バルブなし; 伝統的なフラップバルブ; ウォータートラップバルブ; その他
pt-PT: válvula de sopro da gaita de foles Great Highland: Válvula tipo canister; Sem válvula; Válvula de aba tradicional; Válvula de retenção de água; Outra
lt-LT: Great Highland dūdmaišio pūtimo vamzdžio vožtuvo tipas: Kasetinis vožtuvas; Be vožtuvo; Tradicinis sklendinis vožtuvas; Vandens gaudyklės vožtuvas; Kita
da: Type ventil i mundrør på Great Highland-sækkepibe: Canister-ventil; Ingen ventil; Traditionel klapventil; Vandudskiller-ventil; Andet
sl-SI: Vrsta ventila na pihalni cevi škotskih dud: Kasetni ventil; Brez ventila; Tradicionalni preklopni ventil; Ventil z lovilcem vlage; Drugo
el: Τύπος βαλβίδας επιστομίου για γκάιντες Great Highland: Βαλβίδα δοχείου; Χωρίς βαλβίδα; Παραδοσιακή βαλβίδα κλαπέτου; Βαλβίδα υδατοπαγίδας; Άλλο
hu: Great Highland duda fúvócső szelep típusa: Szelepes tartály; Nincs szelep; Hagyományos csappantyús szelep; Vízcsapdás szelep; Egyéb
vi: Loại van ống thổi kèn túi Great Highland: Van hộp; Không van; Van nắp truyền thống; Van bẫy nước; Khác
hr-HR: Gajde Great Highland tipa ventila za puhanje: Ventil s kanisterom; Bez ventila; Tradicionalni preklopni ventil; Ventil s hvatačem vode; Ostalo
fr: Type de clapet antiretour du porte-vent de la grande cornemuse écossaise: Soupape à cartouche; Sans soupape; Soupape à clapet traditionnelle; Soupape de piège à eau; Autre
ko: 그레이트 하이랜드 백파이프 블로우파이프 밸브 유형: 캐니스터 밸브; 밸브 없음; 전통형 플랩 밸브; 워터 트랩 밸브; 기타
bg-BG: Тип клапан на надувната тръба на гайда Great Highland: Цилиндрична клапа; Без клапа; Традиционна пластинчата клапа; Клапа с воден уловител; Друго
sv: Ventiltyp för blåsrör på Great Highland-säckpipa: Behållarventil; Ingen ventil; Traditionell klaffventil; Vattenavskiljarventil; Övrigt
nb: Great Highland sekkepiper blåserørventiltype: Beholderventil; Ingen ventil; Tradisjonell klaffeventil; Vannlåsventil; Annet
zh-CN: 苏格兰高地风笛吹管阀门型: 罐式阀门; 无阀门; 传统翻板阀门; 集水阀门; 其他
de: Art des Blasrohrventils der Great Highland Bagpipes: Kanisterventil; Kein Ventil; Traditionelles Klappenventil; Wasserfallenventil; Sonstige
cs: Typ klapky píšťaly skotských dud: Kanystrový ventil; Bez ventilu; Tradiční klapkový ventil; Ventil s odlučovačem vody; Ostatní
pt-BR: Gaita de foles Great Highland tipo de válvula do sopro: Válvula de recipiente; Sem válvula; Válvula de aba tradicional; Válvula de retenção de água; Outra
zh-TW: 蘇格蘭高地風笛吹氣管閥門類型: 罐型閥門; 無閥門; 傳統皮瓣閥; 水阱閥; 其他
nl: Great Highland-doedelzak blaaspijpventieltype: Canisterklep; Geen klep; Traditionele terugslagklep; Watervangerklep; Overig
en: Great Highland bagpipes blowpipe valve type: Canister valve; No valve; Traditional flap valve; Water trap valve; Other
it: tipo di valvola per cannello della cornamusa scozzese Great Highland: Valvola a canestro; Nessuna valvola; Valvola a cerniera tradizionale; Valvola di scarico condensa; Altro
ro-RO: Tipul supapei tubului de suflat al cimpoiului Great Highland: Supapă tip canistră; Fără supapă; Supapă tradițională cu clapetă; Supapă de captare a apei; Altele
th: ประเภทวาล์วท่อเป่าของปี่สก็อตขนาดใหญ่: วาล์ว Canister; ไม่มีวาล์ว; ลิ้นวาล์วแบบดั้งเดิม; วาล์วดักน้ำ; อื่นๆ
fi: Great Highland ‑säkkipillit, puhallusputkiventtiilin tyyppi: Säiliöventtiili; Ei venttiiliä; Perinteinen läppäventtiili; Vesilukkoventtiili; Muu
tr: Great Highland gayda üfleme borusu valf tipi: Kanister valf; Valf yok; Geleneksel flap valf; Su tutucu valf; Diğer
pl: Typ zaworu ustnika dud Great Highland: Zawór pojemnikowy; Brak zaworu; Tradycyjny zawór klapkowy; Zawór z pułapką wodną; Inne
ru: Тип клапана мундштука волынки Great Highland: Канистровый клапан; Без клапана; Традиционный лепестковый клапан; Клапан с влагоотделителем; Другое